Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1903
Intent of Nebraska Meat and Poultry Inspection Law.

The intent of the Nebraska Meat and Poultry Inspection Law is to assure that only wholesome meat and poultry products enter regular commercial channels of commerce and to provide that same are identified and truthfully labeled. The director is designated as the administrator of the Nebraska Meat and Poultry Inspection Law and the department is designated as the administrative state agency.

Laws 1969, c. 449, § 3, p. 1507;

Laws 2021, LB324, § 3.